Wisconsin, session 2025, AB355.
do enact as follows:AB355,11Section 1. 40.03 (6) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB355,3,4140.03 (6) (a) 1. Except as provided in par. (m), shall Shall, on behalf of the 2state, enter into a contract or contracts with one or more insurers authorized to 3transact insurance business in this state for the purpose of providing the group 4insurance plans provided for by this chapter; orAB355,25Section 2. 40.03 (6) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB355,3,11640.03 (6) (a) 2. Except as provided in par. (m), may May, wholly or partially in 7lieu of subd. 1., on behalf of the state, provide any group insurance plan on a self-8insured basis in which case the group insurance board shall approve a written 9description setting forth the terms and conditions of the plan, and may contract 10directly with providers of hospital, medical or ancillary services to provide insured 11employees with the benefits provided under this chapter.AB355,312Section 3. 40.03 (6) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB355,3,191340.03 (6) (b) Except as provided in par. (m), may May provide other group 14insurance plans for employees and their dependents and for annuitants and their 15dependents in addition to the group insurance plans specifically provided under 16this chapter. The terms of the group insurance under this paragraph shall be 17determined by contract, and shall provide that the employer is not liable for any 18obligations accruing from the operation of any group insurance plan under this 19paragraph except as agreed to by the employer.AB355,420Section 4. 40.03 (6) (m) of the statutes is repealed.AB355,521Section 5. 40.51 (9m) of the statutes is created to read:AB355,4,22240.51 (9m) Every health care coverage plan offered by the state under sub. (6) 23and every health care coverage plan offered by the group insurance board under 1sub. (7) shall, if the health care coverage plan provides maternity coverage, provide 2coverage for abortion and any other medical services necessary to provide abortion.AB355,63Section 6. 40.56 of the statutes is repealed.AB355,74Section 7. 46.245 of the statutes is repealed.AB355,85Section 8. 48.375 (4) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB355,4,15648.375 (4) (a) 1. The person or the person’s agent has, either directly or 7through a referring physician or his or her agent, received and made part of the 8minor’s medical record, under the requirements of s. 253.10, the voluntary and 9informed written consent of the minor and the voluntary and informed written 10consent of one of her parents; or of the minor’s guardian or legal custodian, if one 11has been appointed; or of an adult family member of the minor; or of one of the 12minor’s foster parents, if the minor has been placed in a foster home and the 13minor’s parent has signed a waiver granting the department, a county department, 14or the foster parent the authority to consent to medical services or treatment on 15behalf of the minor.AB355,916Section 9. 69.186 (1) (hf) of the statutes is amended to read:AB355,4,221769.186 (1) (hf) The probable postfertilization age of the unborn child, as 18defined in s. 253.107 (1) (c), and whether an ultrasound was used to assist in 19making the determination of postfertilization age of the unborn child, gestational 20age of the pregnancy or, if the probable postfertilization age of the unborn child 21gestational age of the pregnancy was not determined, the nature of the medical 22emergency, as defined in s. 253.10 (2) (d) 253.107 (1) (b).AB355,1023Section 10. 69.186 (1) (k) of the statutes is amended to read:AB355,5,22469.186 (1) (k) If the unborn child is considered to be capable of experiencing 1pain under s. 253.107 (3) (a), the nature of the medical emergency, as defined in s. 2253.10 (2) (d) 253.107 (1) (b), that the pregnant woman had.AB355,113Section 11. 253.094 of the statutes is created to read:AB355,5,84253.094 Right to abortion. (1) Every individual has the fundamental right 5to bodily autonomy, which includes the right to access abortion. The state may not 6prohibit an individual from obtaining an abortion at any time during the pregnancy 7if an abortion is necessary in the professional judgment of the individual’s medical 8provider.AB355,5,139(2) (a) Except as provided in sub. (1), a law or rule of this state that restricts 10an individual’s access to abortion is unenforceable if the law or rule does not confer 11any legitimate health benefit, such as by expanding an individual’s access to health 12care services or by, according to evidence-based research, increasing the 13individual’s safety.AB355,5,1814(b) Any person that is or may be aggrieved by the enforcement of a law or rule 15passed or promulgated after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts 16date], that violates this subsection may bring an action in state or federal court for 17injunctive relief or damages against a state or local official who enforces or attempts 18to enforce such a law or rule.AB355,1219Section 12. 253.095 of the statutes is repealed.AB355,1320Section 13. 253.10 of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB355,5,2321253.10 Requirements for providers of abortion care. (1) All 22requirements applicable to health care providers are applicable to providers of 23abortion care.AB355,1424Section 14. 253.105 of the statutes is repealed.AB355,151Section 15. 253.107 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB355,6,42253.107 (1) (b) “Medical emergency” has the meaning given in s. 253.10 (2) (d) 3means a condition, in a physician’s reasonable medical judgment, that makes an 4abortion necessary.AB355,165Section 16. 441.07 (1g) (f) of the statutes is repealed.AB355,176Section 17. 448.02 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB355,7,27448.02 (3) (a) The board shall investigate allegations of unprofessional 8conduct and negligence in treatment by persons holding a license or certificate 9granted by the board. An allegation that a physician has violated s. 253.10 (3), 10448.30 or 450.13 (2) or has failed to mail or present a medical certification required 11under s. 69.18 (2) within 21 days after the pronouncement of death of the person 12who is the subject of the required certificate or that a physician has failed at least 6 13times within a 6-month period to mail or present a medical certificate required 14under s. 69.18 (2) within 6 days after the pronouncement of death of the person who 15is the subject of the required certificate is an allegation of unprofessional conduct. 16Information contained in reports filed with the board under s. 49.45 (2) (a) 12r., 1750.36 (3) (b), 609.17 or 632.715, or under 42 CFR 1001.2005, shall be investigated 18by the board. Information contained in a report filed with the board under s. 19655.045 (1), as created by 1985 Wisconsin Act 29, which is not a finding of 20negligence or in a report filed with the board under s. 50.36 (3) (c) may, within the 21discretion of the board, be used as the basis of an investigation of a person named in 22the report. The board may require a person holding a license or certificate to 23undergo and may consider the results of one or more physical, mental or 1professional competency examinations if the board believes that the results of any 2such examinations may be useful to the board in conducting its investigation.AB355,183Section 18. 448.02 (3) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2023 Wisconsin Act 4172, section 4, and 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), is repealed and recreated to 5read:AB355,7,246448.02 (3) (a) The board shall investigate allegations of unprofessional 7conduct and negligence in treatment by persons holding a license or certificate 8granted by the board. An allegation that a physician has violated s. 448.30 or 9450.13 (2) or has failed to present a medical certification required under s. 69.18 (2) 10within 21 days after the pronouncement of death of the person who is the subject of 11the required certificate or that a physician has failed at least 6 times within a 6-12month period to present a medical certificate required under s. 69.18 (2) within 6 13days after the pronouncement of death of the person who is the subject of the 14required certificate is an allegation of unprofessional conduct. Information 15contained in reports filed with the board under s. 49.45 (2) (a) 12r., 50.36 (3) (b), 16609.17, or 632.715, or under 42 CFR 1001.2005, shall be investigated by the board. 17Information contained in a report filed with the board under s. 655.045 (1), as 18created by 1985 Wisconsin Act 29, which is not a finding of negligence or in a report 19filed with the board under s. 50.36 (3) (c) may, within the discretion of the board, be 20used as the basis of an investigation of a person named in the report. The board 21may require a person holding a license or certificate to undergo and may consider 22the results of one or more physical, mental or professional competency 23examinations if the board believes that the results of any such examinations may be 24useful to the board in conducting its investigation.AB355,191Section 19. 457.26 (2) (gm) of the statutes is repealed.AB355,202Section 20. 632.8985 of the statutes is repealed.AB355,213Section 21. 939.75 (2) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB355,8,64939.75 (2) (b) 1. An act committed during an induced abortion. This 5subdivision does not limit the applicability of ss. 940.04, 940.13, 940.15 and 940.16 6to an induced abortion. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab355 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab355 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB355 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB355 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB355: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting